California, session 20252026, SB1427.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 27491.56 of the Government Code is amended to read:27491.56. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the Forensic Accountability, Custodial Transparency, and Safety (FACTS) Act of 2025.(b) In any county where the offices of the sheriff and the coroner are combined, the sheriff-coroner shall not determine the circumstances, manner, and cause of death pursuant to Section 27491 for any in-custody death, but shall instead do one or both of the following:(1) Contract with one or more counties that have a coroner’s office that operates independently from the office of the sheriff, or that have established an office of medical examiner pursuant to Section 24010, to determine the circumstances, manner, and cause of death. The contracted coroners or medical examiners shall operate independently from the office of the sheriff-coroner in conducting the medical examination process, including, but not limited to, exercising professional judgment to make determinations of the circumstances, manner, and cause of death.(2) Contract with one or more private third-party medical examination providers that are separate and independent from the office of the sheriff-coroner and that meet the physician qualification requirements described in Section 24010 to determine the circumstances, manner, and cause of death. A private third-party medical examination provider shall operate independently from the office of the sheriff-coroner in conducting the medical examination process, including, but not limited to, exercising professional judgment to make determinations of the circumstances, manner, and cause of death.(c) The cause and manner of death listed on the death certificate shall match the cause and manner of death determined by the coroner, medical examiner, or private third-party medical examination provider, as provided in this section.(d) (1) In any county in which the offices of the sheriff and the coroner are combined, the county board of supervisors shall select and enter into a service agreement or service agreements with medical examiners or independent coroner offices from other counties, or with one or more private third-party medical examination providers, or with any combination of those medical examiners, independent coroner offices, or private third-party medical examination providers.(2) A private third-party medical examination provider that has entered into a service agreement with a county, as provided in paragraph (1), may not, during the term of that service agreement, be contracted by the county or the sheriff-coroner of that county to provide medical examination for any cases that do not involve in-custody deaths.(e) Upon the determination of the circumstances, manner, and cause of death, the findings of the examination shall be delivered to the sheriff-coroner, district attorney, county health officer, and board of supervisors of the county in which the death occurred. The findings shall also be delivered to the decedent’s next of kin.(f) For purposes of this section, “in-custody death” means either of the following:(1) An in-custody death as defined in Section 10008 of the Penal Code.(2) A death of a person who is detained, under arrest, or is in the process of being detained or arrested, by a federal law enforcement officer, including for the purposes of immigration enforcement, or who is en route to be detained, or is detained, at a federal correctional facility or immigration detention facility, and for which the sheriff-coroner has jurisdiction or the federal government has requested an autopsy be performed by the sheriff-coroner’s office.(g) This section shall be operative January 1, 2027.SEC. 2. Section 68514 of the Government Code is amended to read:68514. (a) Beginning October 1, 2018, and annually on or before December 31 thereafter, the Judicial Council shall report to the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee the total amount of revenue collected in the prior fiscal year, by each court and county, from criminal fines, fees, forfeitures, penalties, restitution fines described in subdivision (b) of Section 1202.4 of the Penal Code, and assessments related to infractions, misdemeanors, and felonies. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:(1) Total nondelinquent revenue collected and the number of cases associated with those collections.(2) Total delinquent revenue collected and the number of cases associated with those collections, as reported by each superior court and county pursuant to Section 1463.010 of the Penal Code.(3) Total amount of fines and fees dismissed, discharged, or satisfied by means other than payment.(4) A description of the collection activities used by the program or its contracted entities pursuant to Section 1463.007 of the Penal Code.(5) The total amount collected per collection activity. entity.(6) The total number of cases by collection activity entity and the total number of individuals associated with those cases.(7) Total operating costs per collection activity. entity.(8) The percentage of fines or fees that are defaulted on.(9) The extent to which each court or county is meeting the collections best practices and performance measures and benchmarks, metrics, developed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1463.010 of the Penal Code, for its collection program.(10) Any changes necessary to improve the performance of collection programs statewide.(b) The Judicial Council shall separately list the information required in subdivision (a) for fines and fees assessed in a year before the current reporting year that had outstanding balances in the current reporting year.(c) To the extent a court or county cannot provide the information listed in subdivisions (a) and (b), the Judicial Council shall notify the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and shall provide a plan for how to obtain this information in the future. The Department of Finance may approve alternate metrics if a court or county does not have this information.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 17 of the Penal Code is amended to read:17. (a) A felony is a crime that is punishable with death, by imprisonment in the state prison, or, notwithstanding any other law, by imprisonment in a county jail under the provisions of subdivision (h) of Section 1170. Every other crime or public offense is a misdemeanor except those offenses that are classified as infractions.(b) When a crime is punishable, in the discretion of the court, either by imprisonment in the state prison or imprisonment in a county jail under the provisions of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by fine or imprisonment in the county jail, it is a misdemeanor for all purposes under the following circumstances:(1) After a judgment imposing a punishment other than imprisonment in the state prison or imprisonment in a county jail under the provisions of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.(2) When the court, upon committing the defendant to a secure youth treatment facility, designates the offense to be a misdemeanor.(3) When the court grants probation to a defendant and at the time of granting probation, or on application of the defendant or probation officer thereafter, the court declares the offense to be a misdemeanor.(4) When the prosecuting attorney files in a court having jurisdiction over misdemeanor offenses a complaint specifying that the offense is a misdemeanor, unless the defendant at the time of arraignment or plea objects to the offense being made a misdemeanor, in which event the complaint shall be amended to charge the felony and the case shall proceed on the felony complaint.(5) (A) When the court determines, prior to trial, either on its own motion or the motion of a party, that the offense is a misdemeanor, in which event the case shall proceed as if the defendant had been arraigned on a misdemeanor complaint.(B) Following a denial of a motion pursuant to subparagraph (A), a subsequent motion pursuant to subparagraph (A) may only be made upon a showing of changed circumstances, which includes, but is not limited to, newly available facts relevant to the charge or defendant’s personal circumstances, or change in the applicable law.(c) When a person is committed to a secure youth treatment facility for a crime punishable, in the discretion of the court, either by imprisonment in the state prison or imprisonment in a county jail under the provisions of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by fine or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, the offense shall, upon the discharge of the person from the secure youth treatment facility, thereafter be deemed a misdemeanor for all purposes.(d) A violation of any code section listed in Section 19.8 is an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 in either of the following cases:(1) The prosecutor files a complaint charging the offense as an infraction unless the defendant, at the time they are arraigned, after being informed of their rights, elects to have the case proceed as a misdemeanor.(2) The court, with the consent of the defendant, determines that the offense is an infraction, in which event the case shall proceed as if the defendant had been arraigned on an infraction complaint.(e) This section does not authorize a judge to relieve a defendant of the duty to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 if the defendant is charged with an offense for which registration as a sex offender is required pursuant to Section 290, and for which the trier of fact has found the defendant guilty.(f) When the court exercises its discretion under this section, an unfulfilled order of restitution or a restitution fine shall not be grounds for denial of a request or application for reduction.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 1370 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1370. (a) (1) (A) If the defendant is found mentally competent, the criminal process shall resume, the trial on the offense charged or hearing on the alleged violation shall proceed, and judgment may be pronounced.(B) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent and is not charged with an offense listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1001.36, the trial, the hearing on the alleged violation, or the judgment shall be suspended, and the court shall do all of the following:(i) (I) Determine whether restoring the person to mental competence is in the interests of justice.(II) In exercising its discretion pursuant to this clause, the court shall consider the relevant circumstances of the charged offense, including the harm done to the victim, the defendant’s mental health condition, including, without limitation, any intellectual or developmental disability, the history of treatment, the criminal history of the defendant, whether the defendant is likely to face incarceration if convicted, whether the defendant has previously been found incompetent to stand trial, whether restoring the person to mental competence will enhance public safety, and any other relevant considerations. The court shall provide the defense and prosecution an opportunity to be heard on whether restoration is in the interests of justice.(ii) If restoring the person to mental competence is in the interests of justice, the court shall state its reasons orally on the record and the case shall proceed as provided in subparagraph (C).(iii) If restoring the person to mental competence is not in the interests of justice, the court shall conduct a hearing, pursuant to Section 1001.36, and, if the court deems the defendant eligible, grant diversion pursuant to that section for a period not to exceed two years from the date the individual is accepted into diversion or the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for the most serious offense charged in the complaint, whichever is shorter.(I) The hearing shall be held no later than 30 days after the finding of incompetence. If the hearing is delayed beyond 30 days, the court shall order the defendant to be released on their own recognizance pending the hearing.(II) If the defendant performs satisfactorily on diversion pursuant to this subclause, at the end of the period of diversion, the court shall dismiss the criminal charges that were the subject of the criminal proceedings at the time of the initial diversion.(III) If the court finds the defendant ineligible or unsuitable for diversion based on the circumstances set forth in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 1001.36, or if any of the conditions described in subdivision (g) of Section 1001.36 are present, the court may, after notice to the defendant, defense counsel, and the prosecution, hold a hearing to determine whether to do any of the following:(ia) Order modification of the treatment plan in accordance with a recommendation from the treatment provider.(ib) Refer the defendant to assisted outpatient treatment pursuant to Section 5346 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A referral to assisted outpatient treatment may only occur in a county where services are available pursuant to Section 5348 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and the agency agrees to accept responsibility for treatment of the defendant. A hearing to determine eligibility for assisted outpatient treatment shall be held within 45 days after the finding of incompetence. If the hearing is delayed beyond 45 days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into assisted outpatient treatment, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385.(ic) Refer the defendant to the county conservatorship investigator in the county of commitment for possible conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A defendant shall only be referred to the conservatorship investigator if it appears to the court or a qualified mental health expert that the defendant appears to be gravely disabled, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Any hearings required in the conservatorship proceedings shall be held in the superior court in the county of commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of the order directing initiation of conservatorship proceedings to the county mental health director or the director’s designee and shall notify the county mental health director or their designee of the outcome of the proceedings. Before establishing a conservatorship, the public guardian shall investigate all available alternatives to conservatorship pursuant to Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If a petition is not filed within 30 days of the referral, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending conservatorship proceedings. The charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385 upon the filing of either a temporary or permanent conservatorship petition unless the basis for the petition is that the defendant is gravely disabled as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(id) Refer the defendant to the CARE program pursuant to Section 5978 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. A hearing to determine eligibility for the CARE program shall be held within 14 court days after the date on which the petition for the referral is filed. If the hearing is delayed beyond 14 court days, the court shall order the defendant, if confined in county jail, to be released on their own recognizance pending that hearing. If the defendant is accepted into the CARE program, the charges shall be dismissed pursuant to Section 1385.(ie) Reinstate competency proceedings, in which case the court shall credit any time spent in mental health diversion against the maximum term of commitment as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).(C) If the defendant is found mentally incompetent and restoring the defendant to competence is in the interests of justice or they are charged with an offense listed in subdivision (d) of Section 1001.36, the trial, the hearing on the alleged violation, or the judgment shall be suspended until the person becomes mentally competent.(i) The court shall order that the mentally incompetent defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as defined in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, or to any other available public or private treatment facility, including a community-based residential treatment system approved by the community program director, or their designee, that will promote the defendant’s speedy restoration to mental competence, or placed on outpatient status as specified in Section 1600.(ii) (I) If a defendant has been found mentally incompetent, and the court has ordered commitment to a State Department of State Hospitals facility as described in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and is not in the custody of the local sheriff, the department shall inform the sheriff when a placement in a facility becomes available and make reasonable efforts to coordinate a delivery by the sheriff to transport the defendant to the facility. If the department has made reasonable attempts for 90 days, starting with the date of commitment, and the defendant has not been transported, as originally ordered under clause (i), the department shall inform the court and sheriff in writing.(II) If the sheriff has not delivered the defendant to a State Department of State Hospitals facility within 90 days after the department’s written notice, the commitment to the State Department of State Hospitals shall be automatically stayed and the department may remove the defendant from the pending placement list until the court notifies the department in writing that the defendant is available for transport and the defendant shall regain their place on the pending placement list.(iii) However, if the action against the defendant who has been found mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290, the prosecutor shall determine whether the defendant previously has been found mentally incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this chapter on a charge of a Section 290 offense, or whether the defendant is currently the subject of a pending Section 1368 proceeding arising out of a charge of a Section 290 offense. If either determination is made, the prosecutor shall notify the court and defendant in writing. After this notification, and opportunity for hearing, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, or other secure treatment facility for the care and treatment of persons with a mental health disorder, unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative placement would provide more appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.(iv) If the action against the defendant who has been found mentally incompetent is on a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 and the defendant has been denied bail pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12 of Article I of the California Constitution because the court has found, based upon clear and convincing evidence, a substantial likelihood that the person’s release would result in great bodily harm to others, the court shall order that the defendant be delivered by the sheriff to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, as directed by the State Department of State Hospitals, unless the court makes specific findings on the record that an alternative placement would provide more appropriate treatment for the defendant and would not pose a danger to the health and safety of others.(v) (I) If, at any time after the court finds that the defendant is mentally incompetent and before the defendant is transported to a facility pursuant to this section, the court is provided with any information that the defendant may benefit from diversion pursuant to Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6, the court may make a finding that the defendant is an appropriate candidate for diversion.(II) Notwithstanding subclause (I), if a defendant is found mentally incompetent and is transferred to a facility described in Section 4361.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court may, at any time upon receiving any information that the defendant may benefit from diversion pursuant to Chapter 2.8A (commencing with Section 1001.35) of Title 6, make a finding that the defendant is an appropriate candidate for diversion.(vi) If a defendant is found by the court to be an appropriate candidate for diversion pursuant to clause (v), the defendant’s eligibility shall be determined pursuant to Section 1001.36. A defendant granted diversion may participate for the lesser of the period specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or the applicable period described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 1001.36. If, during that period, the court determines that criminal proceedings should be reinstated pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1001.36, the court shall, pursuant to Section 1369, appoint a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or any other expert the court may deem appropriate, to determine the defendant’s competence to stand trial.(vii) Upon the dismissal of charges at the conclusion of the period of diversion, pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1001.36, a defendant shall no longer be deemed incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this section.(viii) The clerk of the court shall notify the Department of Justice, in writing, of a finding of mental incompetence with respect to a defendant who is subject to clause (iii) or (iv) for inclusion in the defendant’s state summary criminal history information.(D) If at any time after the finding of mental incompetence, but before the defendant begins treatment in a program or facility to promote the defendant’s speedy restoration of mental competence pursuant to this section, there is a change in circumstance that affects the likelihood that the defendant will be able to be attain competence, either party may instead petition the court to proceed in accordance with subdivision (b).(E) Upon the filing of a certificate of restoration to competence, the court shall order that the defendant be returned to court in accordance with Section 1372. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.(F) A defendant charged with a violent felony may not be delivered to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or treatment facility pursuant to this subdivision unless the State Department of State Hospitals facility or treatment facility has a secured perimeter or a locked and controlled treatment facility, and the judge determines that the public safety will be protected.(G) For purposes of this paragraph, “violent felony” means an offense specified in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.(H) A defendant charged with a violent felony may be placed on outpatient status, as specified in Section 1600, only if the court finds that the placement will not pose a danger to the health or safety of others. If the court places a defendant charged with a violent felony on outpatient status, as specified in Section 1600, the court shall serve copies of the placement order on defense counsel, the sheriff in the county where the defendant will be placed, and the district attorney for the county in which the violent felony charges are pending against the defendant.(I) If, at any time after the court has declared a defendant incompetent to stand trial pursuant to this section, counsel for the defendant or a jail medical or mental health staff provider provides the court with substantial evidence that the defendant’s psychiatric symptoms have changed to such a degree as to create a doubt in the mind of the judge as to the defendant’s current mental incompetence, the court may appoint a psychiatrist or a licensed psychologist to opine as to whether the defendant has attained competence. If, in the opinion of that expert, the defendant has attained competence, the court shall proceed as if a certificate of restoration of competence has been returned pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372.(J) (i) The State Department of State Hospitals may, pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, conduct an evaluation of the defendant in county custody to determine any of the following:(I) The defendant has attained competence.(II) There is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain competence in the foreseeable future.(III) The defendant should be referred to the county for further evaluation for potential participation in a county diversion program, if one exists, or to another outpatient treatment program.(ii) If, in the opinion of the department’s expert, the defendant has attained competence, the court shall proceed as if a certificate of restoration of competence has been returned pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372.(iii) If, in the opinion of the department’s expert, there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the committing court shall proceed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) no later than 10 days following receipt of the report.(2) Prior to making the order directing that the defendant be committed to the State Department of State Hospitals or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status, the court shall proceed as follows:(A) (i) The court shall order the community program director or a designee to evaluate the defendant and to submit to the court within 15 judicial days of the order a written recommendation as to whether the defendant should be required to undergo outpatient treatment, or be committed to the State Department of State Hospitals or to any other treatment facility. A person shall not be admitted to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status under this section without having been evaluated by the community program director or a designee. The community program director or designee shall evaluate the appropriate placement for the defendant between a State Department of State Hospitals facility or the community-based residential treatment system based upon guidelines provided by the State Department of State Hospitals.(ii) A defendant shall first be considered for placement in an outpatient treatment program, a community treatment program, or a diversion program, if any such program is available, unless a court, based upon the recommendation of the community program director or their designee, finds that either the clinical needs of the defendant or the risk to community safety, warrant placement in a State Department of State Hospitals facility.(B) The court shall hear and determine whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication. The court shall consider opinions in the reports prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, as applicable to the issue of whether the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding the administration of antipsychotic medication, and shall proceed as follows:(i) The court shall hear and determine whether any of the following is true:(I) Based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist or licensed psychologist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication, the defendant’s mental disorder requires medical treatment with antipsychotic medication, and, if the defendant’s mental disorder is not treated with antipsychotic medication, it is probable that serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant will result. Probability of serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant requires evidence that the defendant is presently suffering adverse effects to their physical or mental health, or the defendant has previously suffered these effects as a result of a mental disorder and their condition is substantially deteriorating. The fact that a defendant has a diagnosis of a mental disorder does not alone establish probability of serious harm to the physical or mental health of the defendant.(II) Based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist or licensed psychologist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the defendant is a danger to others, in that the defendant has inflicted, attempted to inflict, or made a serious threat of inflicting substantial physical harm on another while in custody, or the defendant had inflicted, attempted to inflict, or made a serious threat of inflicting substantial physical harm on another that resulted in the defendant being taken into custody, and the defendant presents, as a result of mental disorder or mental defect, a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm on others. Demonstrated danger may be based on an assessment of the defendant’s present mental condition, including a consideration of past behavior of the defendant within six years prior to the time the defendant last attempted to inflict, inflicted, or threatened to inflict substantial physical harm on another, and other relevant evidence.(III) The people have charged the defendant with a serious crime against the person or property, and based upon the opinion of the psychiatrist offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication is substantially likely to render the defendant competent to stand trial, the medication is unlikely to have side effects that interfere with the defendant’s ability to understand the nature of the criminal proceedings or to assist counsel in the conduct of a defense in a reasonable manner, less intrusive treatments are unlikely to have substantially the same results, and antipsychotic medication is medically necessary and appropriate in light of their medical condition.(ii) (I) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) to be true, and if pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a psychiatrist has opined that treatment with antipsychotic medications is appropriate for the defendant, the court shall issue an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medication as needed, including on an involuntary basis, to be administered under the direction and supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.(II) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) to be true, and if pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a licensed psychologist has opined that treatment with antipsychotic medication may be appropriate for the defendant, the court shall issue an order authorizing treatment by a licensed psychiatrist on an involuntary basis. That treatment may include the administration of antipsychotic medication as needed, to be administered under the direction and supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.(III) If the court finds the conditions described in subclause (III) of clause (i) to be true, and if pursuant to the opinion offered to the court pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1369, a psychiatrist has opined that it is appropriate to treat the defendant with antipsychotic medication, the court shall issue an order authorizing the administration of antipsychotic medication as needed, including on an involuntary basis, to be administered under the direction and supervision of a licensed psychiatrist.(iii) An order authorizing involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication to the defendant when and as prescribed by the defendant’s treating psychiatrist at any facility housing the defendant for purposes of this chapter, including a county jail, shall remain in effect when the defendant returns to county custody pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), or pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1372, but shall be valid for no more than one year, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7). The court shall not order involuntary administration of psychotropic medication under subclause (III) of clause (i) unless the court has first found that the defendant does not meet the criteria for involuntary administration of psychotropic medication under subclause (I) of clause (i) and does not meet the criteria under subclause (II) of clause (i).(iv) In all cases, the treating hospital, county jail, facility, or program may administer medically appropriate antipsychotic medication prescribed by a psychiatrist in an emergency as described in subdivision (m) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(v) If the court has determined that the defendant has the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication, and if the defendant, with advice of their counsel, consents, the court order of commitment shall include confirmation that antipsychotic medication may be given to the defendant as prescribed by a treating psychiatrist pursuant to the defendant’s consent. The commitment order shall also indicate that, if the defendant withdraws consent for antipsychotic medication, after the treating psychiatrist complies with the provisions of subparagraph (C), the defendant shall be returned to court for a hearing in accordance with subparagraphs (C) and (D) regarding whether antipsychotic medication shall be administered involuntarily.(vi) If the court has determined that the defendant has the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication and if the defendant, with advice from their counsel, does not consent, the court order for commitment shall indicate that, after the treating psychiatrist complies with the provisions of subparagraph (C), the defendant shall be returned to court for a hearing in accordance with subparagraphs (C) and (D) regarding whether antipsychotic medication shall be administered involuntarily.(vii) A report made pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall include a description of antipsychotic medication administered to the defendant and its effects and side effects, including effects on the defendant’s appearance or behavior that would affect the defendant’s ability to understand the nature of the criminal proceedings or to assist counsel in the conduct of a defense in a reasonable manner. During the time the defendant is confined in a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility or placed on outpatient status, either the defendant or the people may request that the court review any order made pursuant to this subdivision. The defendant, to the same extent enjoyed by other patients in the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility, shall have the right to contact the patients’ rights advocate regarding the defendant’s rights under this section.(C) If the defendant consented to antipsychotic medication as described in clause (iv) of subparagraph (B), but subsequently withdraws their consent, or, if involuntary antipsychotic medication was not ordered pursuant to clause (v) of subparagraph (B), and the treating psychiatrist determines that antipsychotic medication has become medically necessary and appropriate, the treating psychiatrist shall make efforts to obtain informed consent from the defendant for antipsychotic medication. If informed consent is not obtained from the defendant, and the treating psychiatrist is of the opinion that the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions regarding antipsychotic medication based on the conditions described in subclause (I) or (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B), the treating psychiatrist shall certify whether the lack of capacity and any applicable conditions described above exist. That certification shall contain an assessment of the current mental status of the defendant and the opinion of the treating psychiatrist that involuntary antipsychotic medication has become medically necessary and appropriate.(D) (i) If the treating psychiatrist certifies that antipsychotic medication has become medically necessary and appropriate pursuant to subparagraph (C), antipsychotic medication may be administered to the defendant for not more than 21 days, provided, however, that, within 72 hours of the certification, the defendant is provided a medication review hearing before an administrative law judge to be conducted at the facility where the defendant is receiving treatment. The treating psychiatrist shall present the case for the certification for involuntary treatment and the defendant shall be represented by an attorney or a patients’ rights advocate. The attorney or patients’ rights advocate shall be appointed to meet with the defendant no later than one day prior to the medication review hearing to review the defendant’s rights at the medication review hearing, discuss the process, answer questions or concerns regarding involuntary medication or the hearing, assist the defendant in preparing for the hearing and advocating for the defendant’s interests at the hearing, review the panel’s final determination following the hearing, advise the defendant of their right to judicial review of the panel’s decision, and provide the defendant with referral information for legal advice on the subject. The defendant shall also have the following rights with respect to the medication review hearing:(I) To be given timely access to the defendant’s records.(II) To be present at the hearing, unless the defendant waives that right.(III) To present evidence at the hearing.(IV) To question persons presenting evidence supporting involuntary medication.(V) To make reasonable requests for attendance of witnesses on the defendant’s behalf.(VI) To a hearing conducted in an impartial and informal manner.(ii) If the administrative law judge determines that the defendant either meets the criteria specified in subclause (I) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B), or meets the criteria specified in subclause (II) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B), antipsychotic medication may continue to be administered to the defendant for the 21-day certification period. Concurrently with the treating psychiatrist’s certification, the treating psychiatrist shall file a copy of the certification and a petition with the court for issuance of an order to administer antipsychotic medication beyond the 21-day certification period. For purposes of this subparagraph, the treating psychiatrist shall not be required to pay or deposit any fee for the filing of the petition or other document or paper related to the petition.(iii) If the administrative law judge disagrees with the certification, medication may not be administered involuntarily until the court determines that antipsychotic medication should be administered pursuant to this section.(iv) The court shall provide notice to the prosecuting attorney and to the attorney representing the defendant, and shall hold a hearing, no later than 18 days from the date of the certification, to determine whether antipsychotic medication should be ordered beyond the certification period.(v) If, as a result of the hearing, the court determines that antipsychotic medication should be administered beyond the certification period, the court shall issue an order authorizing the administration of that medication.(vi) The court shall render its decision on the petition and issue its order no later than three calendar days after the hearing and, in any event, no later than the expiration of the 21-day certification period.(vii) If the administrative law judge upholds the certification pursuant to clause (ii), the court may, for a period not to exceed 14 days, extend the certification and continue the hearing pursuant to stipulation between the parties or upon a finding of good cause. In determining good cause, the court may review the petition filed with the court, the administrative law judge’s order, and any additional testimony needed by the court to determine if it is appropriate to continue medication beyond the 21-day certification and for a period of up to 14 days.(viii) The district attorney, county counsel, or representative of a facility where a defendant found incompetent to stand trial is committed may petition the court for an order to administer involuntary medication pursuant to the criteria set forth in subclauses (II) and (III) of clause (i) of subparagraph (B). The order is reviewable as provided in paragraph (7).(3) (A) When the court orders that the defendant be committed to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other public or private treatment facility, the court shall provide copies of the following documents prior to the admission of the defendant to the State Department of State Hospitals or other treatment facility where the defendant is to be committed:(i) The commitment order, which shall include a specification of the charges, an assessment of whether involuntary treatment with antipsychotic medications is warranted, and any orders by the court, pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), authorizing involuntary treatment with antipsychotic medications.(ii) A computation or statement setting forth the maximum term of commitment in accordance with subdivision (c).(iii) (I) A computation or statement setting forth the amount of credit for time served, if any, to be deducted from the maximum term of commitment.(II) If a certificate of restoration of competency was filed with the court pursuant to Section 1372 and the court subsequently rejected the certification, a copy of the court order or minute order rejecting the certification shall be provided. The court order shall include a new computation or statement setting forth the amount of credit for time served, if any, to be deducted from the defendant’s maximum term of commitment based on the court’s rejection of the certification.(iv) State summary criminal history information.(v) Jail classification records for the defendant’s current incarceration.(vi) Arrest reports prepared by the police department or other law enforcement agency.(vii) Court-ordered psychiatric examination or evaluation reports.(viii) The community program director’s placement recommendation report.(ix) Records of a finding of mental incompetence pursuant to this chapter arising out of a complaint charging a felony offense specified in Section 290 or a pending Section 1368 proceeding arising out of a charge of a Section 290 offense.(x) Medical records, including jail mental health records.(B) If a defendant is committed to a State Department of State Hospitals facility, and the department determines that additional medical or mental health treatment records are needed for continuity of care, any private or public entity holding medical or mental health treatment records of that defendant shall release those records upon receiving a written request from the State Department of State Hospitals within 10 calendar days after the request. The private or public entity holding the medical or mental health treatment records shall comply with all applicable federal and state privacy laws prior to disclosure. The State Department of State Hospitals shall not release records obtained during the admission process under this subdivision, pursuant to Section 1798.68 of the Civil Code, or subdivision (b) of Section 5328 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(4) When the defendant is committed to a treatment facility pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) or the court makes the findings specified in clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) to assign the defendant to a treatment facility other than a State Department of State Hospitals facility or other secure treatment facility, the court shall order that notice be given to the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction at the placement facility of a finding of mental incompetence pursuant to this chapter arising out of a charge of a Section 290 offense.(5) When directing that the defendant be confined in a State Department of State Hospitals facility pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall commit the defendant to the State Department of State Hospitals.(6) (A) If the defendant is committed or transferred to the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to this section, the court may, upon receiving the written recommendation of the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility and the community program director that the defendant be transferred to a public or private treatment facility approved by the community program director, order the defendant transferred to that facility. If the defendant is committed or transferred to a public or private treatment facility approved by the community program director, the court may, upon receiving the written recommendation of the community program director, transfer the defendant to the State Department of State Hospitals or to another public or private treatment facility approved by the community program director. In the event of dismissal of the criminal charges before the defendant recovers competence, the person shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code). If either the defendant or the prosecutor chooses to contest either kind of order of transfer, a petition may be filed in the court for a hearing, which shall be held if the court determines that sufficient grounds exist. At the hearing, the prosecuting attorney or the defendant may present evidence bearing on the order of transfer. The court shall use the same standards as are used in conducting probation revocation hearings pursuant to Section 1203.2.Prior to making an order for transfer under this section, the court shall notify the defendant, the attorney of record for the defendant, the prosecuting attorney, and the community program director or a designee.(B) If the defendant is initially committed to a State Department of State Hospitals facility or secure treatment facility pursuant to clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) and is subsequently transferred to any other facility, copies of the documents specified in paragraph (3) shall be electronically transferred or taken with the defendant to each subsequent facility to which the defendant is transferred. The transferring facility shall also notify the appropriate law enforcement agency or agencies having local jurisdiction at the site of the new facility that the defendant is a person subject to clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).(7) (A) An order by the court authorizing involuntary medication of the defendant shall be valid for no more than one year. The court shall review the order at the time of the review of the initial report and the six-month progress reports pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to determine if the grounds for the authorization remain. In the review, the court shall consider the reports of the treating psychiatrist or psychiatrists and the defendant’s patients’ rights advocate or attorney. The court may require testimony from the treating psychiatrist and the patients’ rights advocate or attorney, if necessary. The court may continue the order authorizing involuntary medication for up to another six months, or vacate the order, or make any other appropriate order.(B) Within 60 days before the expiration of the one-year involuntary medication order, the district attorney, county counsel, or representative of any facility where a defendant found incompetent to stand trial is committed may petition the committing court for a renewal, subject to the same conditions and requirements as in subparagraph (A). The petition shall include the basis for involuntary medication set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). Notice of the petition shall be provided to the defendant, the defendant’s attorney, and the district attorney. The court shall hear and determine whether the defendant continues to meet the criteria set forth in clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). The hearing on a petition to renew an order for involuntary medication shall be conducted prior to the expiration of the current order.(8) For purposes of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) and paragraph (7), if the treating psychiatrist determines that there is a need, based on preserving their rapport with the defendant or preventing harm, the treating psychiatrist may request that the facility medical director designate another psychiatrist to act in the place of the treating psychiatrist. If the medical director of the facility designates another psychiatrist to act pursuant to this paragraph, the treating psychiatrist shall brief the acting psychiatrist of the relevant facts of the case and the acting psychiatrist shall examine the defendant prior to the hearing.(b) (1) Within 90 days after a commitment made pursuant to subdivision (a), the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility to which the defendant is confined shall make a written report to the court and the community program director for the county or region of commitment, or a designee, concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication remains necessary.If the defendant is in county custody, the county jail shall provide access to the defendant for purposes of the State Department of State Hospitals conducting an evaluation of the defendant pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Based upon this evaluation, the State Department of State Hospitals may make a written report to the court within 90 days of a commitment made pursuant to subdivision (a) concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication is necessary. If the defendant remains in county custody after the initial 90-day report, the State Department of State Hospitals may conduct an evaluation of the defendant pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and make a written report to the court concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication is necessary.If the defendant is on outpatient status, the outpatient treatment staff shall make a written report to the community program director concerning the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence. Within 90 days of placement on outpatient status, the community program director shall report to the court on this matter. If the defendant has not recovered mental competence, but the report discloses a substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the defendant shall remain in the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility or on outpatient status. Thereafter, at six-month intervals or until the defendant becomes mentally competent, if the defendant is confined in a treatment facility, the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or person in charge of the facility shall report, in writing, to the court and the community program director or a designee regarding the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence and whether the administration of antipsychotic medication remains necessary. If the defendant is on outpatient status, after the initial 90-day report, the outpatient treatment staff shall report to the community program director on the defendant’s progress toward recovery, and the community program director shall report to the court on this matter at six-month intervals. A copy of these reports shall be provided to the prosecutor and defense counsel by the court.(A) If the report indicates that there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, custody of the defendant shall be transferred without delay to the committing county and shall remain with the county until further order of the court. The defendant shall be returned to the court for proceedings pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) no later than 10 days following receipt of the report. The court shall not order the defendant returned to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals under the same commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.(B) If the report indicates that there is no substantial likelihood that the defendant will attain mental competence in the foreseeable future, the medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility to which the defendant is confined shall do both of the following:(i) Promptly notify and provide a copy of the report to the defense counsel and the district attorney.(ii) Provide a separate notification, in compliance with applicable privacy laws, to the committing county’s sheriff that immediate transportation will be needed for the defendant pursuant to subparagraph (A).(C) If a county does not take custody of a defendant committed to the State Department of State Hospitals within 10 calendar days following notification made pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (B), the county shall be charged the daily rate for a state hospital bed, as established by the State Department of State Hospitals.(2) The reports made pursuant to paragraph (1) concerning the defendant’s progress toward attaining competency shall also consider the issue of involuntary medication. Each report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) Whether or not the defendant has the capacity to make decisions concerning antipsychotic medication.(B) If the defendant lacks the capacity to make decisions concerning antipsychotic medication, whether the defendant risks serious harm to their physical or mental health if not treated with antipsychotic medication.(C) Whether or not the defendant presents a danger to others if the defendant is not treated with antipsychotic medication.(D) Whether the defendant has a mental disorder for which medications are the only effective treatment.(E) Whether there are any side effects from the medication currently being experienced by the defendant that would interfere with the defendant’s ability to collaborate with counsel.(F) Whether there are any effective alternatives to medication.(G) How quickly the medication is likely to bring the defendant to competency.(H) Whether the treatment plan includes methods other than medication to restore the defendant to competency.(I) A statement, if applicable, that no medication is likely to restore the defendant to competency.(3) After reviewing the reports, the court shall determine if grounds for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication exist, whether or not an order was issued at the time of commitment, and shall do one of the following:(A) If the original grounds for involuntary medication still exist, any order authorizing the treating facility to involuntarily administer antipsychotic medication to the defendant shall remain in effect.(B) If the original grounds for involuntary medication no longer exist, and there is no other basis for involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication, any order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be vacated.(C) If the original grounds for involuntary medication no longer exist, and the report states that there is another basis for involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication, the court shall determine whether to vacate the order or issue a new order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication. The court shall consider the opinions in reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), including any opinions rendered pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The court may, upon a showing of good cause, set a hearing within 21 days to determine whether the order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be vacated or whether a new order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be issued. The hearing shall proceed as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The court shall require witness testimony to occur remotely, including clinical testimony pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In-person witness testimony shall only be allowed upon a court’s finding of good cause.(D) If the report states a basis for involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication and the court did not issue such order at the time of commitment, the court shall determine whether to issue an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication. The court shall consider the opinions in reports submitted pursuant to paragraph (1), including any opinions rendered pursuant to Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The court may, upon a finding of good cause, set a hearing within 21 days to determine whether an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medication shall be issued. The hearing shall proceed as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). The court shall require witness testimony to occur remotely, including clinical testimony pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4335.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. In-person witness testimony shall only be allowed upon a court’s finding of good cause.(E) This paragraph also applies to recommendations submitted pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 1372, when a recommendation is included as to whether an order for the involuntary administration of antipsychotic medications should be extended or issued.(4) If it is determined by the court that treatment for the defendant’s mental impairment is not being conducted, the defendant shall be returned to the committing court, and, if the defendant is not in county custody, returned to the custody of the county. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the community program director or a designee.(5) At each review by the court specified in this subdivision, the court shall determine if the security level of housing and treatment is appropriate and may make an order in accordance with its determination. If the court determines that the defendant shall continue to be treated in the State Department of State Hospitals facility or on an outpatient basis, the court shall determine issues concerning administration of antipsychotic medication, as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).(c) (1) At the end of two years from the date of commitment or a period of commitment equal to the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for the most serious offense charged in the information, indictment, or complaint, or the maximum term of imprisonment provided by law for a violation of probation or mandatory supervision, whichever is shorter, but no later than 90 days prior to the expiration of the defendant’s term of commitment, a defendant who has not recovered mental competence shall be returned to the committing court, and custody of the defendant shall be transferred without delay to the committing county and shall remain with the county until further order of the court. The court shall not order the defendant returned to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals under the same commitment. The court shall notify the community program director or a designee of the return and of any resulting court orders. The maximum term of commitment applies to the aggregate of all previous commitments.(2) (A) The medical director of the State Department of State Hospitals facility or other treatment facility to which the defendant is confined shall provide notification, in compliance with applicable privacy laws, to the committing county’s sheriff that immediate transportation will be needed for the defendant pursuant to paragraph (1).(B) If a county does not take custody of a defendant committed to the State Department of State Hospitals within 10 calendar days following notification pursuant to subparagraph (A), the county shall be charged the daily rate for a state hospital bed, as established by the State Department of State Hospitals.(3) Whenever a defendant is returned to the court pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision, subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (b), and it appears to the court that the defendant is gravely disabled, as defined in subparagraph (A) or (B), or both, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court shall order the conservatorship investigator of the county of commitment of the defendant to initiate conservatorship proceedings for the defendant pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Hearings required in the conservatorship proceedings shall be held in the superior court in the county that ordered the commitment. The court shall transmit a copy of the order directing initiation of conservatorship proceedings to the community program director or a designee, the sheriff and the district attorney of the county in which criminal charges are pending, and the defendant’s counsel of record. The court shall notify the community program director or a designee, the sheriff and district attorney of the county in which criminal charges are pending, and the defendant’s counsel of record of the outcome of the conservatorship proceedings.(4) If a defendant is returned to court pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision, subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or paragraph (1) or (4) of subdivision (b), and the prosecution elects to dismiss and refile charges pursuant to Section 1387, the court shall presume that the defendant is incompetent unless the court is presented with relevant and credible evidence that the defendant is competent. This evidence may include medical records, witness statements, or reports by qualified medical experts. If the court is satisfied that it has received substantial evidence that the defendant is competent, the court shall proceed as provided in Section 1369. Otherwise, the court shall find that the defendant is not mentally competent to stand trial and shall proceed as provided in paragraphs (1) and (3). The court shall not order the defendant returned to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals for the purpose of restoration of competency.(5) If a change in placement is proposed for a defendant who is committed pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court shall provide notice and an opportunity to be heard with respect to the proposed placement of the defendant to the sheriff and the district attorney of the county in which the criminal charges or revocation proceedings are pending.(6) If the defendant is confined in a treatment facility, a copy of any report to the committing court regarding the defendant’s progress toward recovery of mental competence shall be provided by the committing court to the prosecutor and to the defense counsel.(d) With the exception of proceedings alleging a violation of mandatory supervision, or in those instances where the defendant has been placed under a conservatorship pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the criminal action remains subject to dismissal pursuant to Section 1385. If the criminal action is dismissed, the court shall transmit a copy of the order of dismissal to the community program director or a designee. In a proceeding alleging a violation of mandatory supervision, if the person is not placed under a conservatorship as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), or if a conservatorship is terminated, the court shall reinstate mandatory supervision and may modify the terms and conditions of supervision to include appropriate mental health treatment or refer the matter to a local mental health court, reentry court, or other collaborative justice court available for improving the mental health of the defendant.(e) If the criminal action against the defendant is dismissed, the defendant shall be released from commitment ordered under this section, but without prejudice to the initiation of proceedings that may be appropriate under the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).(f) As used in this chapter, “community program director” means the person, agency, or entity designated by the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 1605 of this code and Section 4360 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(g) For the purpose of this section, “secure treatment facility” does not include, except for State Department of State Hospitals facilities, state developmental centers, and correctional treatment facilities, any facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of, or Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 1569) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or any community board and care facility.(h) This section does not preclude a defendant from filing a petition for habeas corpus to challenge the continuing validity of an order authorizing a treatment facility or outpatient program to involuntarily administer antipsychotic medication to a person being treated as incompetent to stand trial.SEC. 5. Section 1463.007 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1463.007. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a county or court that operates a comprehensive collection program may deduct the costs of operating that program, excluding capital expenditures, from any revenues collected under that program. The costs shall be deducted before any distribution of revenues to other governmental entities required by any other law. A county or court operating a comprehensive collection program may establish a minimum base fee, fine, forfeiture, penalty, or assessment amount for inclusion in the program.(b) Once debt becomes delinquent, it continues to be delinquent and may be subject to collection by a comprehensive collection program. Debt is delinquent and subject to collection by a comprehensive collection program if any of the following conditions is met:(1) A defendant does not post bail or appear on or before the date on which the defendant promised to appear, or any lawful continuance of that date, if that defendant was eligible to post and forfeit bail.(2) A defendant does not pay the amount imposed by the court on or before the date ordered by the court, or any lawful continuance of that date.(3) A defendant has failed to make an installment payment on the date specified by the court.(c) For the purposes of this section, a “comprehensive collection program” is a separate and distinct revenue collection activity that meets each of the following criteria:(1) The program identifies and collects amounts arising from delinquent court-ordered debt, whether or not a warrant has been issued against the alleged violator.(2) The program complies with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1463.010.(3) The program is administered by a county and superior court working in cooperation, although, by mutual agreement, one or the other may serve as the primary administrator of the program. The program may contract with one or more of the following entities to collect delinquent debt:(A) The Franchise Tax Board’s Court-Ordered Debt Collections Program. (B) The Franchise Tax Board’s Interagency Intercept Collections Program.(C) One or more private debt collectors.(D) Other government entities, when approved by the program and after the Judicial Council has been notified. (3)(4) The program program, or at least one of its contracted entities, engages in each of the following activities:(A)Attempts telephone contact with delinquent debtors for whom the program has a telephone number to inform them of their delinquent status and payment options. (B)(A) Notifies delinquent debtors for whom the program has an address in writing of their outstanding obligation within 95 days of delinquency.(B) Attempts technological or telephonic contact with delinquent debtors to inform them of their delinquent status and payment options.(C) Generates internal monthly reports to track collections data, such as age of debt and delinquent amounts outstanding.(D) Uses Department of Motor Vehicles information to locate delinquent debtors.(E) Accepts electronic payment of delinquent debt by credit card. or debit card, electronic funds transfer, or other online payment methods, as accepted by the program.(4)(5) The program program, or at least one of its contracted entities, engages in at least five three of the following activities:(A)Sends delinquent debt to the Franchise Tax Board’s Court-Ordered Debt Collections Program.(B)Sends delinquent debt to the Franchise Tax Board’s Interagency Intercept Collections Program.(C)Contracts with one or more private debt collectors to collect delinquent debt. (D)(A) Sends monthly bills payment reminders or account statements to all delinquent debtors.(E)(B) Contracts with local, regional, state, or national skip tracing or locator resources or services to locate delinquent debtors.(F)(C) Coordinates with the probation department to locate debtors who may be on formal or informal probation.(G)(D) Uses Employment Development Department employment and wage information to collect delinquent debt.(H)(E) Establishes wage and bank account garnishments where appropriate.(F) Uses administrative offsets to collect delinquent debt, including, but not limited to, the withholding of funds as authorized by statute. (I)(G) Places liens on real property owned by delinquent debtors when appropriate.(J)(H) Uses an automated dialer or automatic call message distribution system to manage telephone calls. technological or telephonic contacts.(d) A comprehensive collection program shall also administer nondelinquent installment payment plans ordered pursuant to Section 68645.2 of the Government Code, and may recover up to and including thirty-five dollars ($35) per nondelinquent installment plan.SEC. 4.SEC. 6. Section 1524.2 of the Penal Code is amended to read:1524.2. (a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:(1) The terms “electronic communication services” and “remote computing services” shall be construed in accordance with the Electronic Communications Privacy Act of 1986 in Chapter 121 (commencing with Section 2701) of Part I of Title 18 of the United States Code. This section does not apply to corporations that do not provide those services to the general public.(2) An “adverse result” occurs when notification of the existence of a search warrant results in:(A) Danger to the life or physical safety of an individual.(B) A flight from prosecution.(C) The destruction of or tampering with evidence.(D) The intimidation of potential witnesses.(E) Serious jeopardy to an investigation or undue delay of a trial.(3) “Applicant” refers to the peace officer to whom a search warrant is issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1528.(4) “California corporation” refers to any corporation or other entity that is subject to Section 102 of the Corporations Code, excluding foreign corporations.(5) “Foreign corporation” refers to any corporation that is qualified to do business in this state pursuant to Section 2105 of the Corporations Code, or any corporation, excluding a California corporation, that transacts intrastate business.(6) “Properly served” means that a search warrant has been delivered by hand, or in a manner reasonably allowing for proof of delivery if delivered by United States mail, overnight delivery service, or facsimile to a person or entity listed in Section 2110 of the Corporations Code, or any other means specified by the recipient of the search warrant, including email or submission via an internet web portal that the recipient has designated for the purpose of service of process, or, if the recipient is not qualified to do business in this state pursuant to Section 2105 of the Corporations Code, any means reasonably calculated to give actual notice.(b) The following provisions apply to any search warrant issued pursuant to this chapter allowing a search for records that are in the actual or constructive possession of a foreign corporation that provides electronic communication services or remote computing services to the general public, where those records would reveal the identity of the customers using those services, data stored by, or on behalf of, the customer, the customer’s usage of those services, the recipient or destination of communications sent to or from those customers, or the content of those communications.(1) When properly served with a search warrant issued by the California court, a foreign corporation subject to this section shall provide to the applicant, all records sought pursuant to that warrant within five business days of receipt, including those records maintained or located outside this state.(2) If the applicant makes a showing and the magistrate finds that failure to produce records within less than five business days would cause an adverse result, the warrant may require production of records within less than five business days. A court may reasonably extend the time required for production of the records upon finding that the foreign corporation has shown good cause for that extension and that an extension of time would not cause an adverse result.(3) A foreign corporation seeking to quash the warrant must seek relief from the court that issued the warrant within the time required for production of records pursuant to this section. The issuing court shall hear and decide that motion no later than five court days after the motion is filed.(4) The foreign corporation shall verify the authenticity of records that it produces by providing an affidavit that complies with the requirements set forth in Section 1561 of the Evidence Code. Those records shall be admissible in evidence as set forth in Section 1562 of the Evidence Code.(c) (1) A California corporation that provides electronic communication services or remote computing services to the general public, when served with a warrant issued by another state to produce records that would reveal the identity of the customers using those services, data stored by, or on behalf of, the customer, the customer’s usage of those services, the recipient or destination of communications sent to or from those customers, or the content of those communications, shall produce those records as if that warrant had been issued by a California court, but shall not produce records when the corporation knows or should know that the warrant relates to an investigation into, or enforcement of, a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.(2) A California corporation shall not comply with subdivision (c) unless the warrant includes, or is accompanied by, an attestation that the evidence sought is not related to an investigation into, or enforcement of, a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.(3) A California corporation served with a warrant described in paragraph (1) is entitled to rely on the representations made in an attestation described in paragraph (2) in determining whether the warrant relates to an investigation into, or enforcement of, a prohibited violation, as defined in Section 629.51.(d) A cause of action shall not lie against any foreign or California corporation subject to this section, its officers, employees, agents, or other specified persons for providing records, information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a warrant issued pursuant to this chapter.SEC. 5.SEC. 7. Section 26202 of the Penal Code is amended to read:26202. (a) Unless a court makes a contrary determination pursuant to Section 26206, an applicant shall be deemed to be a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 if the applicant satisfies any one or more of the following:(1) Is reasonably likely to be a danger to self, others, or the community at large, as demonstrated by anything in the application for a license or through the investigation described in subdivision (b), or as shown by the results of any psychological assessment, including, but not limited to, the assessment described in subdivision (e) of Section 26190.(2) Has been convicted of contempt of court under Section 166 or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable elements of contempt of court under Section 166.(3) Has been subject to any restraining order, protective order, or other type of court order issued pursuant to the following statutory provisions, or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable elements of those statutory provisions, unless that order expired or was vacated or otherwise canceled more than five years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application, or that order expired or was vacated or otherwise canceled and the applicant did not receive notice and an opportunity to be heard before the order was issued:(A) Section 646.91 or Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240) of Division 10 of the Family Code.(B) Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 of the Family Code.(C) Sections 136.2 and 18100.(D) Section 527.6, 527.8, or 527.85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.(E) Section 213.5, 304, 362.4, 726.5, or 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(4) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been convicted of an offense listed in Section 422.6, 422.7, 422.75, or 29805, or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable elements of those offenses.(5) Has engaged in an unlawful or reckless use, display, or brandishing of a firearm.(6) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been charged with any offense listed in Section 290, 667.5, 1192.7, 1192.8, or 29805, or any federal law or law of any other state that includes comparable elements of those offenses, that was dismissed pursuant to a plea or dismissed with a waiver pursuant to People v. Harvey (1979) 25 Cal.3d 754.(7) In the five years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has been committed to or incarcerated in county jail or state prison for, or on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision as a result of, a conviction of an offense, an element of which involves controlled substances, as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, or alcohol.(8) Is, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code and applicable regulations and guidance, an unlawful user of or addicted to any controlled substance.(9) Is currently abusing any controlled substance, as described in Sections 11053 to 11058, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, or alcohol. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “abusing” means excessive use or consumption reflecting that the applicant has lost the power of self-control with reference to the controlled substance or alcohol.(10) In the 10 years prior to the licensing authority receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, has experienced the loss or theft of multiple firearms due to the applicant’s lack of compliance with federal, state, or local law regarding storing, transporting, or securing the firearm. For purposes of this paragraph, “multiple firearms” includes a loss of more than one firearm on the same occasion, or the loss of a single firearm on more than one occasion.(11) Failed to report a loss of a firearm as required by Section 25250 or any other state, federal, or local law requiring the reporting of the loss of a firearm.(b) In determining whether an applicant is a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license in accordance with subdivision (a), the licensing authority shall conduct an investigation that meets all of the following minimum requirements:(1) An in-person interview of the applicant or a virtual interview of the applicant, where the applicant appears by video and audio, at the applicant’s election. For renewal applications, the licensing authority may elect to forgo this requirement.(2) In-person, virtual, or telephonic interviews with at least three character references, at least one of whom must be a person described in subdivision (b) of Section 273.5, if applicable, and at least one of whom must be the applicant’s cohabitant, if applicable. For renewal applications, the licensing authority may elect to forgo this requirement.(3) A review of publicly available information about the applicant, including publicly available statements published or posted by the applicant.(4) A review of all information provided in the application for a license.(5) A review of all information provided by the Department of Justice in accordance with subdivision (a) of, paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of, and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 26185, as well as firearms eligibility notices or any other information subsequently provided to the licensing authority regarding the applicant.(6) A review of the information in the California Restraining and Protective Order System accessible through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System, including information indicating that the applicant is reasonably likely to be a danger to self, others, or the community at large pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), or that the applicant is otherwise a disqualified person pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).(c) In determining whether an applicant is a disqualified person and cannot receive or renew a license in accordance with subdivision (a), this section does not preclude the licensing authority from engaging in investigative efforts in addition to those listed in subdivision (b).(d) Within 90 days of receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, the licensing authority shall give written notice to the applicant of the licensing authority’s initial determination, based on its investigation thus far, of whether an applicant is a disqualified person pursuant to Section 26150, 26155, or 26170 as follows:(1) (A) If the licensing authority makes an initial determination that, based on its investigation thus far, the applicant is not a disqualified person, the notice shall inform the applicant to proceed with the training requirements specified in Section 26165. The licensing authority shall then submit the applicant’s fingerprints or the renewal notification to the Department of Justice in accordance with Section 26185.(B) The initial determination described in subparagraph (A) shall include a final determination as to whether the applicant is or is not a disqualified person pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a).(2) If, within 90 days of receiving the completed application for a new license or a license renewal, the licensing authority determines that the applicant is a disqualified person, the notice shall inform the applicant that the request for a license has been denied, state the reason as to why the determination was made, and inform the applicant that they may request a hearing from a court, as outlined in Section 26206. A licensing authority providing notice under this paragraph informing the applicant that the request for a license has been denied satisfies the requirement to provide notice of a denial of a license pursuant to Section 26205.(e) The prohibitions listed in subdivision (a) shall apply whether or not the relevant conduct, order, conviction, charge, commitment, or other relevant action took place or was issued or entered before the effective date of the act that added this subdivision.(f) Upon determining the applicant is a disqualified person pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a), the licensing authority shall, within five days, submit to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System Index the full name, date of birth, and physical description of the applicant reflecting that the applicant meets the criteria of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code and regulations issued pursuant thereto, and shall include supporting documentation validating any identifying information provided about the applicant and the licensing authority’s determination. The supporting documentation required under this subdivision shall include proof of an arrest or a conviction, results of a test administered on the applicant or substance, or documentation of the admission of use, as applicable, as well as the date of any such arrest, conviction, test, or admission. Unless the licensing authority’s document retention policies provide for a longer period, the licensing authority shall retain any such supporting documentation for 12 months from the date of submission.SEC. 6.SEC. 8. Section 871.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:871.5. (a) Except as authorized by law, or when authorized by the person in charge of any county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or secure youth treatment facility within a juvenile hall, or by an officer of any juvenile hall or camp, or secure youth treatment facility within a juvenile hall, empowered by the person in charge to give that authorization, any person who knowingly brings or sends into, or who knowingly assists in bringing into, or sending into, any county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or any secure youth treatment facility within a juvenile hall, or any person who while confined in any of those institutions possesses therein, any controlled substance, the possession of which is prohibited by Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, any firearm, weapon, or explosive of any kind, or any tear gas or tear gas weapon shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code.(b) Except as otherwise authorized in the manner provided in subdivision (a), any person who knowingly uses tear gas or uses a tear gas weapon in a county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or secure youth treatment facility within a juvenile hall, is guilty of a felony.(c) A sign shall be posted at the entrance of each county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or secure youth treatment facility within a juvenile hall, specifying the conduct prohibited by this section and the penalties therefor.(d) Except as otherwise authorized in the manner provided in subdivision (a), any person who knowingly brings or sends into, or who knowingly assists in bringing into, or sending into, any county juvenile hall, ranch, camp, or forestry camp, or any person who while confined in such an institution knowingly possesses therein, any alcoholic beverage shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.(e) This section shall not be construed to preclude or in any way limit the applicability of any other law proscribing a course of conduct also proscribed by this section.SEC. 7.SEC. 9. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 8.SEC. 10. Any section of any act enacted by the Legislature during the 2026 calendar year that takes effect on or before January 1, 2027, and that amends, amends and renumbers, adds, repeals and adds, or repeals a section that is amended, amended and renumbered, added, repealed and added, or repealed by this act, shall prevail over this act, whether the act is enacted before, or subsequent to, the enactment of this act.